Massachusetts, session 194th, H2955.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the state
retirement board shall retire Jamie J. Magarian, a uniformed member of the department of state
police, who as a result of injuries sustained while in the performance of his duties in March
2018, is totally and permanently incapacitated from performing the essential duties of a
uniformed member of the department of state police.
(b) The annual amount of pension payable to Jamie J. Magarian shall be equal to the
regular rate of compensation that would have been paid had he continued in service as a
uniformed member of the department of state police at the grade held by him at the time of his
retirement until his death or reaching mandatory retirement age, whichever comes first. The
additional benefits granted in this act shall be funded and administered by the state retirement
of 2

board, consistent with and subject to chapter 32 of the General Laws. All amounts paid under
this act shall be non-taxable to the extent allowable under state law.
(c) Upon attaining the mandatory retirement age for a uniformed member of the
department of state police, Jamie J. Magarian shall receive a pension pursuant to section 7 of said
chapter 32, a yearly amount of pension equal to 80 per cent of the annual rate of the
compensation he was receiving on the day before he reaches the mandatory retirement age for a
uniformed member of the department of state police of the commonwealth.
SECTION 2. Jamie J. Magarian shall be entitled to receive indemnification for all
hospital, medical and related expenses that have been or may be incurred after the date of his
retirement as a result of the injuries sustained by him while in the performance of his duties in
March 2018.
SECTION 3. In addition to the benefits granted herein and upon retirement, Jamie J.
Magarian shall receive a lump sum from the state retirement board equal to his total accumulated
retirement deductions.
SECTION 4. If Jamie J. Magarian is married at the time of retirement, then upon his
death, should his spouse, survive him, the state retirement board shall pay to her an annuity in the
amount of 75 per cent of the amount of the pension that otherwise would have been payable to
him until her death.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2